Maryland, session 2025, SB0301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–721.
(a) In this section, “abandoned or sunken vessel” means any vessel that:
(1) Is left illegally or has remained without permission for more than 30
days on public property, including public marinas, docks, or boatyards;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0301*

SENATE BILL 301
(2) Has remained at the following locations for more than 60 days without
the consent of the owner or person in control of the property:
(i) A private marina or property operated by a private marina; or
(ii) A private boatyard or property operated by a private boatyard;
(3) Has remained at the following locations for more than 30 days without
the consent of the owner or person in control of the property:
(i) A private dock; or
(ii) At or near waters’ edge on private property;
(4) Has remained on private property other than the private property
described in items (2) and (3) of this subsection for more than 180 days without the consent
of the owner or person in control of the property; or
(5) (i) Has been found adrift or unattended in or upon the waters of the
State and:
1. Is found in a condition of disrepair;
2. Presents a hazard or obstruction to the use of the waters
of the State; or
3. Presents a potential health or environmental hazard; and
(ii) Is not:
1. Historic property as defined in § 5A–301 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article; or
2. Submerged archaeological historic property as defined in
§ 5A–333 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(b) (1) The Department may seize, remove, and take into custody any
abandoned or sunken vessel.
(2) For this purpose, the Department may use its own personnel,
equipment, and facilities or use other persons, equipment, and facilities for removing,
preserving, or storing abandoned or sunken vessels.
(3) The Department, or a person removing, preserving, or storing an
abandoned or sunken vessel on behalf of the Department, may not be held liable for any

SENATE BILL 301 3
damage to an abandoned or sunken vessel which may occur during removal, storage, or
custody of the vessel.
(j) The Department may [not] use funds budgeted for the Natural Resources
Police for the purpose of removing or storing abandoned or sunken vessels under this
section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.